engadj_cd.lexc
!!!engadj_cd.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +A +COMP +SUPER

LEXICON Root

Adjective ;

LEXICON Adjective

big Ainf;
brimful Ainf;
cruel Ainf;
dim Ainf;
drab Ainf;
dun Ainf;
fat Ainf;
fit Ainf;
flat Ainf;
glad Ainf;
glib Ainf;
glum Ainf;
grim Ainf;
hip Ainf;
hot Ainf;
loyal Ainf;
mad Ainf;
net Ainf;
prim Ainf;
red Ainf;
rum Ainf;
sad Ainf;
slim Ainf;
smug Ainf;
snug Ainf;
tan Ainf;
thin Ainf;
trim Ainf;
wan Ainf;
wet Ainf;

LEXICON Ainf

[stem]+A:0 #;
[stem]+A+COMP:^er #;
[stem]+A+SUPER:^est #;
